Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4646.
people of the state of michigan enact: CHAPTER XVII Sec. 1. As used in this chapter: (a) "Aircraft" means that term as defined in section 2 of the aeronautics code of the state of Michigan, 1945 PA 327, MCL 259.2. (b) "Companion animal" means that term as defined in section 50b of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.50b. (c) (b) "Departure" means that term as defined in section 31 of chapter IX. (d) (c) "Homicide" means any crime in which the death of a human being is an element of that crime. (e) (d) "Intermediate sanction" means that term as defined in section 31 of chapter IX. (f) (e) "ORV" means that term as defined in section 81101 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.81101. (g) (f) "Snowmobile" means that term as defined in section 82101 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.82101. (h) (g) "Vehicle" means that term as defined in section 79 of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.79. (i) (h) "Vessel" means that term as defined in section 80104 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.80104.